Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5406HV (2) 91 je/ns H.F. 2241 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 262C.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âBorrowerâ means the same as defined in section 261F.1. 4 2. âEducational loanâ means an educational loan, as defined 5 in section 261F.1, for which a loan agreement is entered into 6 on or after July 1, 2026. 7 3. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 8 governed by the state board of regents. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 262C.2 Default on educational loan ââ 10 liability of institution. 11 If a borrower defaults on an educational loan obtained to 12 pay for or finance the higher education expenses of a student 13 incurred during the studentâs enrollment at an institution, the 14 institution shall be liable for ten percent of the amount owed 15 by the borrower as a result of the default. The institutionâs 16 liability shall offset ten percent of the borrowerâs liability 17 for the default. The institutionâs liability shall be governed 18 by the same terms as the borrower unless otherwise negotiated 19 by the institution. 20